Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.110

License renewal.

(1) Every holder of a nursing home administrator's license shall renew that license by fulfilling the continuing competency requirement and by complying with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees as determined according to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The board may prescribe rules for maintenance of a license for temporary or permanent withdrawal or retirement from the active practice of nursing home administration.

(2) A condition of renewal shall be the presentation of proof by the applicant that the board requirement for continuing competency related to the administration of nursing homes has been met.

[ 1996 c 191 s 26; 1992 c 53 s 8; 1991 c 3 s 120; 1984 c 279 s 69; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 54; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 9; 1970 ex.s. c 57 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.